Illinois, session 104th, HB1826.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-172 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-172)7    Sec. 15-172. Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment Freeze 8Homestead Exemption. 9    (a) This Section may be cited as the Low-Income Senior 10Citizens Assessment Freeze Homestead Exemption.11    (b) As used in this Section:12    "Applicant" means an individual who has filed an 13application under this Section.14    "Base amount" means the base year equalized assessed value 15of the residence plus the first year's equalized assessed 16value of any added improvements which increased the assessed 17value of the residence after the base year.18    "Base year" means the taxable year prior to the taxable 19year for which the applicant first qualifies and applies for 20the exemption provided that in the prior taxable year the 21property was improved with a permanent structure that was 22occupied as a residence by the applicant who was liable for 23paying real property taxes on the property and who was either   HB1826- 2 -LRB104 09223 HLH 19280 b1(i) an owner of record of the property or had legal or 2equitable interest in the property as evidenced by a written 3instrument or (ii) had a legal or equitable interest as a 4lessee in the parcel of property that was single family 5residence. If in any subsequent taxable year for which the 6applicant applies and qualifies for the exemption the 7equalized assessed value of the residence is less than the 8equalized assessed value in the existing base year (provided 9that such equalized assessed value is not based on an assessed 10value that results from a temporary irregularity in the 11property that reduces the assessed value for one or more 12taxable years), then that subsequent taxable year shall become 13the base year until a new base year is established under the 14terms of this paragraph. For taxable year 1999 only, the Chief 15County Assessment Officer shall review (i) all taxable years 16for which the applicant applied and qualified for the 17exemption and (ii) the existing base year. The assessment 18officer shall select as the new base year the year with the 19lowest equalized assessed value. An equalized assessed value 20that is based on an assessed value that results from a 21temporary irregularity in the property that reduces the 22assessed value for one or more taxable years shall not be 23considered the lowest equalized assessed value. The selected 24year shall be the base year for taxable year 1999 and 25thereafter until a new base year is established under the 26terms of this paragraph.  HB1826- 3 -LRB104 09223 HLH 19280 b1    "Chief County Assessment Officer" means the County 2Assessor or Supervisor of Assessments of the county in which 3the property is located.4    "Consumer Price Index-u" means the index published by the 5Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of 6Labor that measures the average change in prices of goods and 7services purchased by all urban consumers, United States city 8average, all items, 1982-84=100. 9    "Equalized assessed value" means the assessed value as 10equalized by the Illinois Department of Revenue.11    "Household" means the applicant, the spouse of the 12applicant, and all persons using the residence of the 13applicant as their principal place of residence.14    "Household income" means the combined income of the 15members of a household for the calendar year preceding the 16taxable year.17    "Income" has the same meaning as provided in Section 3.07 18of the Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities Property 19Tax Relief Act, except that, beginning in assessment year 202001, "income" does not include veteran's benefits.21    "Internal Revenue Code of 1986" means the United States 22Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or any successor law or laws 23relating to federal income taxes in effect for the year 24preceding the taxable year.25    "Life care facility that qualifies as a cooperative" means 26a facility as defined in Section 2 of the Life Care Facilities   HB1826- 4 -LRB104 09223 HLH 19280 b1Act.2    "Maximum income limitation" means:3        (1) $35,000 prior to taxable year 1999;4        (2) $40,000 in taxable years 1999 through 2003;5        (3) $45,000 in taxable years 2004 through 2005;6        (4) $50,000 in taxable years 2006 and 2007;7        (5) $55,000 in taxable years 2008 through 2016; 8        (6) for taxable year 2017, (i) $65,000 for qualified 9    property located in a county with 3,000,000 or more 10    inhabitants and (ii) $55,000 for qualified property 11    located in a county with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants; 12    and 13        (7) for taxable years 2018 through 2025 and 14    thereafter, $65,000 for all qualified property; . 15        (8) for taxable year 2026, $75,000; and 16        (9) for taxable years 2027 and thereafter, the maximum 17    income limitation for the immediately preceding taxable 18    year, multiplied by one plus the percentage increase, if 19    any, in the Consumer Price Index-u for the 12-month period 20    ending in September of the calendar year immediately 21    preceding the taxable year for which the limitation is 22    calculated. 23    As an alternative income valuation, a homeowner who is 24enrolled in any of the following programs may be presumed to 25have household income that does not exceed the maximum income 26limitation for that tax year as required by this Section: Aid   HB1826- 5 -LRB104 09223 HLH 19280 b1to the Aged, Blind or Disabled (AABD) Program or the 2Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), both of 3which are administered by the Department of Human Services; 4the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP), which 5is administered by the Department of Commerce and Economic 6Opportunity; The Benefit Access program, which is administered 7by the Department on Aging; and the Senior Citizens Real 8Estate Tax Deferral Program. 9    A chief county assessment officer may indicate that he or 10she has verified an applicant's income eligibility for this 11exemption but may not report which program or programs, if 12any, enroll the applicant. Release of personal information 13submitted pursuant to this Section shall be deemed an 14unwarranted invasion of personal privacy under the Freedom of 15Information Act. 16    "Residence" means the principal dwelling place and 17appurtenant structures used for residential purposes in this 18State occupied on January 1 of the taxable year by a household 19and so much of the surrounding land, constituting the parcel 20upon which the dwelling place is situated, as is used for 21residential purposes. If the Chief County Assessment Officer 22has established a specific legal description for a portion of 23property constituting the residence, then that portion of 24property shall be deemed the residence for the purposes of 25this Section.26    "Taxable year" means the calendar year during which ad   HB1826- 6 -LRB104 09223 HLH 19280 b1valorem property taxes payable in the next succeeding year are 2levied.3    (c) Beginning in taxable year 1994, a low-income senior 4citizens assessment freeze homestead exemption is granted for 5real property that is improved with a permanent structure that 6is occupied as a residence by an applicant who (i) is 65 years 7of age or older during the taxable year, (ii) has a household 8income that does not exceed the maximum income limitation, 9(iii) is liable for paying real property taxes on the 10property, and (iv) is an owner of record of the property or has 11a legal or equitable interest in the property as evidenced by a 12written instrument. This homestead exemption shall also apply 13to a leasehold interest in a parcel of property improved with a 14permanent structure that is a single family residence that is 15occupied as a residence by a person who (i) is 65 years of age 16or older during the taxable year, (ii) has a household income 17that does not exceed the maximum income limitation, (iii) has 18a legal or equitable ownership interest in the property as 19lessee, and (iv) is liable for the payment of real property 20taxes on that property. 21    In counties of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the amount 22of the exemption for all taxable years is the equalized 23assessed value of the residence in the taxable year for which 24application is made minus the base amount. In all other 25counties, the amount of the exemption is as follows: (i) 26through taxable year 2005 and for taxable year 2007 and   HB1826- 7 -LRB104 09223 HLH 19280 b1thereafter, the amount of this exemption shall be the 2equalized assessed value of the residence in the taxable year 3for which application is made minus the base amount; and (ii) 4for taxable year 2006, the amount of the exemption is as 5follows:6        (1) For an applicant who has a household income of 7    $45,000 or less, the amount of the exemption is the 8    equalized assessed value of the residence in the taxable 9    year for which application is made minus the base amount.10        (2) For an applicant who has a household income 11    exceeding $45,000 but not exceeding $46,250, the amount of 12    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 13    residence in the taxable year for which application is 14    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.8.15        (3) For an applicant who has a household income 16    exceeding $46,250 but not exceeding $47,500, the amount of 17    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 18    residence in the taxable year for which application is 19    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.6.20        (4) For an applicant who has a household income 21    exceeding $47,500 but not exceeding $48,750, the amount of 22    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 23    residence in the taxable year for which application is 24    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.4.25        (5) For an applicant who has a household income 26    exceeding $48,750 but not exceeding $50,000, the amount of   HB1826- 8 -LRB104 09223 HLH 19280 b1    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 2    residence in the taxable year for which application is 3    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.2. 4    When the applicant is a surviving spouse of an applicant 5for a prior year for the same residence for which an exemption 6under this Section has been granted, the base year and base 7amount for that residence are the same as for the applicant for 8the prior year.9    Each year at the time the assessment books are certified 10to the County Clerk, the Board of Review or Board of Appeals 11shall give to the County Clerk a list of the assessed values of 12improvements on each parcel qualifying for this exemption that 13were added after the base year for this parcel and that 14increased the assessed value of the property.15    In the case of land improved with an apartment building 16owned and operated as a cooperative or a building that is a 17life care facility that qualifies as a cooperative, the 18maximum reduction from the equalized assessed value of the 19property is limited to the sum of the reductions calculated 20for each unit occupied as a residence by a person or persons 21(i) 65 years of age or older, (ii) with a household income that 22does not exceed the maximum income limitation, (iii) who is 23liable, by contract with the owner or owners of record, for 24paying real property taxes on the property, and (iv) who is an 25owner of record of a legal or equitable interest in the 26cooperative apartment building, other than a leasehold   HB1826- 9 -LRB104 09223 HLH 19280 b1interest. In the instance of a cooperative where a homestead 2exemption has been granted under this Section, the cooperative 3association or its management firm shall credit the savings 4resulting from that exemption only to the apportioned tax 5liability of the owner who qualified for the exemption. Any 6person who willfully refuses to credit that savings to an 7owner who qualifies for the exemption is guilty of a Class B 8misdemeanor.9    When a homestead exemption has been granted under this 10Section and an applicant then becomes a resident of a facility 11licensed under the Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the 12Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized Mental Health 13Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community Care Act, or 14the MC/DD Act, the exemption shall be granted in subsequent 15years so long as the residence (i) continues to be occupied by 16the qualified applicant's spouse or (ii) if remaining 17unoccupied, is still owned by the qualified applicant for the 18homestead exemption.19    Beginning January 1, 1997, when an individual dies who 20would have qualified for an exemption under this Section, and 21the surviving spouse does not independently qualify for this 22exemption because of age, the exemption under this Section 23shall be granted to the surviving spouse for the taxable year 24preceding and the taxable year of the death, provided that, 25except for age, the surviving spouse meets all other 26qualifications for the granting of this exemption for those   HB1826- 10 -LRB104 09223 HLH 19280 b1years.2    When married persons maintain separate residences, the 3exemption provided for in this Section may be claimed by only 4one of such persons and for only one residence.5    For taxable year 1994 only, in counties having less than 63,000,000 inhabitants, to receive the exemption, a person 7shall submit an application by February 15, 1995 to the Chief 8County Assessment Officer of the county in which the property 9is located. In counties having 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, 10for taxable year 1994 and all subsequent taxable years, to 11receive the exemption, a person may submit an application to 12the Chief County Assessment Officer of the county in which the 13property is located during such period as may be specified by 14the Chief County Assessment Officer. The Chief County 15Assessment Officer in counties of 3,000,000 or more 16inhabitants shall annually give notice of the application 17period by mail or by publication. In counties having less than 183,000,000 inhabitants, beginning with taxable year 1995 and 19thereafter, to receive the exemption, a person shall submit an 20application by July 1 of each taxable year to the Chief County 21Assessment Officer of the county in which the property is 22located. A county may, by ordinance, establish a date for 23submission of applications that is different than July 1. The 24applicant shall submit with the application an affidavit of 25the applicant's total household income, age, marital status 26(and if married the name and address of the applicant's   HB1826- 11 -LRB104 09223 HLH 19280 b1spouse, if known), and principal dwelling place of members of 2the household on January 1 of the taxable year. The Department 3shall establish, by rule, a method for verifying the accuracy 4of affidavits filed by applicants under this Section, and the 5Chief County Assessment Officer may conduct audits of any 6taxpayer claiming an exemption under this Section to verify 7that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the exemption. Each 8application shall contain or be verified by a written 9declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury. A 10taxpayer's signing a fraudulent application under this Act is 11perjury, as defined in Section 32-2 of the Criminal Code of 122012. The applications shall be clearly marked as applications 13for the Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment Freeze Homestead 14Exemption and must contain a notice that any taxpayer who 15receives the exemption is subject to an audit by the Chief 16County Assessment Officer.17    Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, in 18counties having fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if an 19applicant fails to file the application required by this 20Section in a timely manner and this failure to file is due to a 21mental or physical condition sufficiently severe so as to 22render the applicant incapable of filing the application in a 23timely manner, the Chief County Assessment Officer may extend 24the filing deadline for a period of 30 days after the applicant 25regains the capability to file the application, but in no case 26may the filing deadline be extended beyond 3 months of the   HB1826- 12 -LRB104 09223 HLH 19280 b1original filing deadline. In order to receive the extension 2provided in this paragraph, the applicant shall provide the 3Chief County Assessment Officer with a signed statement from 4the applicant's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, 5or physician assistant stating the nature and extent of the 6condition, that, in the physician's, advanced practice 7registered nurse's, or physician assistant's opinion, the 8condition was so severe that it rendered the applicant 9incapable of filing the application in a timely manner, and 10the date on which the applicant regained the capability to 11file the application.12    Beginning January 1, 1998, notwithstanding any other 13provision to the contrary, in counties having fewer than 143,000,000 inhabitants, if an applicant fails to file the 15application required by this Section in a timely manner and 16this failure to file is due to a mental or physical condition 17sufficiently severe so as to render the applicant incapable of 18filing the application in a timely manner, the Chief County 19Assessment Officer may extend the filing deadline for a period 20of 3 months. In order to receive the extension provided in this 21paragraph, the applicant shall provide the Chief County 22Assessment Officer with a signed statement from the 23applicant's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or 24physician assistant stating the nature and extent of the 25condition, and that, in the physician's, advanced practice 26registered nurse's, or physician assistant's opinion, the   HB1826- 13 -LRB104 09223 HLH 19280 b1condition was so severe that it rendered the applicant 2incapable of filing the application in a timely manner.3    In counties having less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if an 4applicant was denied an exemption in taxable year 1994 and the 5denial occurred due to an error on the part of an assessment 6official, or his or her agent or employee, then beginning in 7taxable year 1997 the applicant's base year, for purposes of 8determining the amount of the exemption, shall be 1993 rather 9than 1994. In addition, in taxable year 1997, the applicant's 10exemption shall also include an amount equal to (i) the amount 11of any exemption denied to the applicant in taxable year 1995 12as a result of using 1994, rather than 1993, as the base year, 13(ii) the amount of any exemption denied to the applicant in 14taxable year 1996 as a result of using 1994, rather than 1993, 15as the base year, and (iii) the amount of the exemption 16erroneously denied for taxable year 1994.17    For purposes of this Section, a person who will be 65 years 18of age during the current taxable year shall be eligible to 19apply for the homestead exemption during that taxable year. 20Application shall be made during the application period in 21effect for the county of his or her residence. 22    The Chief County Assessment Officer may determine the 23eligibility of a life care facility that qualifies as a 24cooperative to receive the benefits provided by this Section 25by use of an affidavit, application, visual inspection, 26questionnaire, or other reasonable method in order to insure   HB1826- 14 -LRB104 09223 HLH 19280 b1that the tax savings resulting from the exemption are credited 2by the management firm to the apportioned tax liability of 3each qualifying resident. The Chief County Assessment Officer 4may request reasonable proof that the management firm has so 5credited that exemption.6    Except as provided in this Section, all information 7received by the chief county assessment officer or the 8Department from applications filed under this Section, or from 9any investigation conducted under the provisions of this 10Section, shall be confidential, except for official purposes 11or pursuant to official procedures for collection of any State 12or local tax or enforcement of any civil or criminal penalty or 13sanction imposed by this Act or by any statute or ordinance 14imposing a State or local tax. Any person who divulges any such 15information in any manner, except in accordance with a proper 16judicial order, is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.17    Nothing contained in this Section shall prevent the 18Director or chief county assessment officer from publishing or 19making available reasonable statistics concerning the 20operation of the exemption contained in this Section in which 21the contents of claims are grouped into aggregates in such a 22way that information contained in any individual claim shall 23not be disclosed.24    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for taxable 25year 2017 and thereafter, in counties of 3,000,000 or more 26inhabitants, the amount of the exemption shall be the greater   HB1826- 15 -LRB104 09223 HLH 19280 b1of (i) the amount of the exemption otherwise calculated under 2this Section or (ii) $2,000. 3    (c-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 4chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 5the 2020 taxable year, without application, for any property 6that was approved for this exemption for the 2019 taxable 7year, provided that: 8        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 9    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 10    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency; 11        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 12    1, 2020 is the same as the owner of record of the property 13    as of January 1, 2019; 14        (3) the exemption for the 2019 taxable year has not 15    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 16    this Code; and 17        (4) the applicant for the 2019 taxable year has not 18    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2019 or 2020 19    taxable years. 20    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude or impair the 21authority of a chief county assessment officer to conduct 22audits of any taxpayer claiming an exemption under this 23Section to verify that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the 24exemption as provided elsewhere in this Section. 25    (c-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 26chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for   HB1826- 16 -LRB104 09223 HLH 19280 b1the 2021 taxable year, without application, for any property 2that was approved for this exemption for the 2020 taxable 3year, if:4        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 5    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 6    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency;7        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 8    1, 2021 is the same as the owner of record of the property 9    as of January 1, 2020;10        (3) the exemption for the 2020 taxable year has not 11    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 12    this Code; and13        (4) the taxpayer for the 2020 taxable year has not 14    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2020 or 2021 15    taxable years.16    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude or impair the 17authority of a chief county assessment officer to conduct 18audits of any taxpayer claiming an exemption under this 19Section to verify that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the 20exemption as provided elsewhere in this Section. 21    (d) Each Chief County Assessment Officer shall annually 22publish a notice of availability of the exemption provided 23under this Section. The notice shall be published at least 60 24days but no more than 75 days prior to the date on which the 25application must be submitted to the Chief County Assessment 26Officer of the county in which the property is located. The   HB1826- 17 -LRB104 09223 HLH 19280 b1notice shall appear in a newspaper of general circulation in 2the county.3    Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates 4Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for the 5implementation of any mandate created by this Section. 6(Source: P.A. 101-635, eff. 6-5-20; 102-136, eff. 7-23-21; 7102-895, eff. 5-23-22.) 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.